Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE B. INFORMATION AND PLANNING

CHAPTER 2060. INTERAGENCY DATA TRANSPARENCY COMMISSION

Sec. 2060.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "commission" means the Interagency Data Transparency Commission.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 639 (S.B. 1844), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 2060.002. COMMISSION CREATED. The commission is created to study and review:

(1) the current public data structure, classification, sharing, and reporting protocols for state agencies; and

(2) the possibility of collecting and posting data from state agencies online in an open source format that is machine-readable, exportable, and easily accessible by the public.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 639 (S.B. 1844), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 2060.003. STUDY. The study conducted by the commission must consider methods to:

(1) structure, classify, and share data among state agencies;

(2) more efficiently gather and process data;

(3) collect and post data online in an open source format that is machine-readable, exportable, and easily accessible by the public;

(4) standardize data across state agencies;

(5) incorporate reporting practices by state agencies into the open data systems of the state;

(6) improve coordination of interagency data;

(7) improve sharing of data between state agencies;

(8) reduce the costs of collecting data;

(9) reduce duplicative data and information;

(10) increase accountability and ensure state agencies share and report the data collected by the state agencies;

(11) improve information management and analysis to:

(A) increase information security;

(B) uncover fraud and waste;

(C) reduce costs incurred by state agencies;

(D) improve operations performed by state agencies; and

(E) verify compliance with applicable laws; and

(12) determine other data and transparency issues.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 639 (S.B. 1844), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 2060.004. REPORT. (a) Not later than September 1, 2016, the commission shall provide to the governor, lieutenant governor, and speaker of the house of representatives a final report on data reporting practices by state agencies. The report must include:

(1) recommendations for efficient and effective solutions under the commission's charge under Section 2060.003, in addition to solutions to other data and transparency issues identified by the commission;

(2) proposals for legislation necessary to implement the recommendations described by Subdivision (1);

(3) administrative recommendations; and

(4) a complete explanation of each of the commission's recommendations.

(b) The commission shall provide any additional reports requested by the governor, lieutenant governor, or speaker of the house of representatives.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 639 (S.B. 1844), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 2060.005. MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION. (a) The commission is composed of the following members:

(1) two representatives from the Department of Information Resources, appointed by the executive director of the department;

(2) a representative of the Texas Legislative Council, appointed by the executive director of the council;

(3) a representative of the Legislative Budget Board, appointed by the director of the board;

(4) a member of each committee of the house of representatives and the senate with primary jurisdiction over information resources, appointed by the chair of each committee;

(5) the chair of the State Agency Coordinating Committee established by the Department of Information Resources, or a member of the committee appointed by the chair;

(6) a representative of the comptroller, appointed by the comptroller;

(7) a representative appointed by the governor, who serves as the presiding officer of the commission;

(8) a representative appointed by the lieutenant governor; and

(9) a representative appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

(b) A commission member is not entitled to reimbursement of expenses or to compensation.

(c) A vacancy on the commission shall be filled as soon as practicable in the same manner as the original appointment.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 639 (S.B. 1844), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 2060.006. ASSISTANCE BY STATE AGENCIES. The comptroller or a state agency with a representative on the commission shall provide any assistance the commission requires to perform the commission's duties.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 639 (S.B. 1844), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.